Ohio, session 136, HB364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3717.54 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3717.54. A food service operation shall denote on its menu or menu board the food items that contain milk, eggs, fish, crustacean shellfish, tree nuts, peanuts, wheat, or soybeans. With respect to a catering food service operation, the operation shall inform its patrons, in a reasonable manner, of the food items that include such allergens.